Washington statutes.
RCW 19.94.565

Department rules for electric vehicle service providers.

(1) By January 1, 2023, the department, in consultation with the department of commerce and the Washington utilities and transportation commission, must adopt rules requiring all electric vehicle service providers make available multiple payment methods at all publicly available level 2 electric vehicle supply equipment or direct current fast charger electric vehicle supply equipment installed in Washington and may review and, if necessary, amend the rules every two years, to maintain consistency with evolving technology. At a minimum, the rules must include:

(a) Deadlines for electric vehicle service provider compliance for publicly available direct current fast charger electric vehicle supply equipment installed prior to a specific date;

(b) Deadlines for electric vehicle service provider compliance for publicly available level 2 electric vehicle supply equipment installed prior to a specific date;

(c) Deadlines for electric vehicle service provider compliance for publicly available direct current fast charger electric vehicle supply equipment installed on or after a specific date;

(d) Deadlines for electric vehicle service provider compliance for publicly available level 2 electric vehicle supply equipment installed on or after a specific date;

(e) Minimum required payment methods that are convenient and reasonably support access for all current and future users at publicly available level 2 electric vehicle supply equipment and direct current fast charger electric vehicle supply equipment installed in Washington. Payment methods may include, but are not limited to:

(i) A credit card reader device physically located on or in either the electric vehicle supply equipment unit or a kiosk used to service that electric vehicle supply equipment. Contactless credit card reader devices may be used as an option to meet the requirements of this subsection;

(ii) A toll-free number on each electric vehicle supply equipment and kiosk used to service that electric vehicle supply equipment that provides the user with the option to initiate a charging session and submit payment at any time that the electric vehicle supply equipment is operational and publicly available;

(iii) A mobile payment option used to initiate a charging session;

(f) Means for conducting a charging session in languages other than English;

(g) Means for facilitating charging sessions for consumers who are unbanked, underbanked, or low-moderate income, such as accepting prepaid cards through a card reader device. Methods established in (e) of this subsection may be used to meet this requirement if they adequately facilitate charging sessions for these consumers.

(2) In adopting the rules required under subsection (1) of this section, the department must seek to minimize costs and maximize benefits to the public.

(3) The electric vehicle service provider may not require a subscription, membership, or account or a minimum balance on an account in order to initiate a charging session at electric vehicle supply equipment subject to this section.

(4) For the purpose of this section, "mobile payment" means an electronic fund transfer initiated through a mobile phone or device.

[ 2021 c 238 s 5.]